Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 35. Personal Information Privacy Act.

§ 59.1-442.
Sale of purchaser information; notice required.

No merchant, without giving notice to the purchaser, shall sell to any third person information that concerns the purchaser and that is gathered in connection with the sale, rental, or exchange of tangible personal property to the purchaser at the merchant’s
place of business. Notice required by this section may be by the posting of a sign or any other reasonable method. If requested by a purchaser not to sell such information, the merchant shall not do so. No merchant shall sell any
information gathered solely as the result of any customer payment by personal check, credit card, or where the merchant records the number of the customer’s driver’s license or other document issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction. This subsection shall not be construed as authorizing a merchant to sell to a third person any information concerning a purchaser if the sale
or dissemination of the information is prohibited pursuant to § 59.1-443.3.

For the purposes of this section and § 59.1-443.3, “merchant” means any person or entity engaged in the sale of goods from a fixed retail location in Virginia.

History.
1992, c. 807; 2014, cc. 789, 795; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation
cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact
of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 789 and 795 are identical, and designated the existing provisions as subsections A and B; added the last sentence in subsection A; and inserted “and § 59.1-443.3” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical and substituted “records the number of the customer’s driver’s license or other document issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction” for “records the customer’s driver’s license number” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
16 M.J. Right of Privacy, § 1.

§ 59.1-443.
Exceptions.

Section 59.1-442 shall not apply to: (i) information gathered for purposes of extending credit or the recording and sale, rental, exchange or disclosure to others of information obtained from any public body as defined in the Virginia Freedom of Information
Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.); (ii) the sale of information concerning a check or credit card transaction when it is incidental to the sale or other disposition of accounts receivable; (iii) the furnishing by a merchant of information on
check writing activity of its customers in conjunction with check validation transactions; or (iv) information sold in connection with any sale by a business of the business’s retail operations at one or more locations, provided that
the information is sold only to the purchasers thereof.

History.
1992, c. 807; 1993, c. 453; 2004, c. 241.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 241 substituted “Section 59.1-442” for “This chapter.”

§ 59.1-443.1.
Recording date of birth as condition of accepting checks prohibited.

As used in this section:“Check” shall have the same meaning as defined in §

8.3A-104

.

Except as provided in subsection C, no person who accepts checks for the transaction of business shall, as a condition of accepting the check, record, or request or require a person to record, his or her date of birth upon the check or otherwise.

This section does not require a person to accept checks for the transaction of business. Nothing in this section shall apply to (i) the collection or use of a date of birth that is unrelated to accepting payment by check or (ii) a requirement that the
person paying by check provide the year of his birth.

History.
2004, c. 241; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, deleted subdivision A 2 which read: “ ‘Person’ shall have the same meaning as defined in § 1-13.19.”; and made a related change.

§ 59.1-443.2.
Restricted use of social security numbers.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a person shall not:

Intentionally communicate another individual’s social security number to the general public;

Print an individual’s social security number on any card required for the individual to access or receive products or services provided by the person;

Require an individual to use his social security number to access an Internet website, unless a password, unique personal identification number or other authentication device is also required to access the site; or

Send or cause to be sent or delivered any letter, envelope, or package that displays a social security number on the face of the mailing envelope or package, or from which a social security number is visible, whether on the outside or inside of the mailing
envelope or package.

This section does not prohibit the collection, use, or release of a social security number as permitted by the laws of the Commonwealth or the United States, or the use of a social security number for internal verification or administrative purposes unless
such use is prohibited by a state or federal statute, rule, or regulation.

In the case of any (i) health care provider as defined in §

8.01-581.1

, (ii) manager of a pharmacy benefit plan, (iii) insurer as defined in §

38.2-100

, (iv) corporation providing a health services plan, (v) health maintenance organization providing a health care plan for health care services, or (vi) contractor of any such person, the prohibition contained in
subdivision 2 of subsection A shall become effective on January 1, 2006.

This section shall not apply to public bodies as defined in §

2.2-3701

.

No person shall embed an encrypted or unencrypted social security number in or on a card or document, including, but not limited to, using a bar code, chip, magnetic strip, or other technology, in place of removing the social security number as required
by this section.

History.
2005, c. 640; 2008, cc. 562, 820.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 562 and 820 are identical, and substituted “another individual’s” for “an individual’s” in subdivision A 1; and in subsection D, deleted the clause (i) designation preceding “public bodies,” and deleted clause (ii), which read:
“or (ii) records required by law to be open to the public, and shall not be construed to limit access to records pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).”

§ 59.1-443.3.
Scanning information from driver’s license or other document; retention, sale, or dissemination of information.

No merchant may scan the machine-readable zone of a driver’s license or other document issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction, except for the following purposes:

To verify authenticity of the driver’s license or other document or to verify the identity of the individual if the individual requests a service pursuant to a membership or a service agreement, pays for goods or services with a method other than cash,
returns an item, or requests a refund or an exchange;

To verify the individual’s age when providing age-restricted goods or services to the individual if there is a reasonable doubt of the individual having reached 18 years of age or older;

To prevent fraud or other criminal activity if the individual returns an item or requests a refund or an exchange and the merchant uses a fraud prevention service company or system. Information collected by scanning an individual’s driver’s license or
other document pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the individual’s name, address, and date of birth and the number of the driver’s license or other document;

To comply with a requirement imposed on the merchant by the laws of the Commonwealth or federal law;

To provide to a check services company regulated by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, (15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.), that receives information obtained from an individual’s driver’s license or other document to administer or enforce a transaction or
to prevent fraud or other criminal activity; or

To complete a transaction permitted under the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, (15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.), or the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, (15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.).

No merchant shall retain any information obtained from a scan of the machine-readable zone of an individual’s driver’s license or other document except as permitted in subdivision A 1, 3, 4, 5, or 6. The merchant shall destroy the retained information
when the purpose for which it was provided and retained under this section has been satisfied.

No merchant shall sell or disseminate to a third party any information obtained from a scan of the machine-readable zone of an individual’s driver’s license or other document for any marketing, advertising, or promotional purpose. This subsection shall
not prohibit a merchant from disseminating to a third party any such information for a purpose described in subdivision A 3, 4, 5, or 6.

Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

History.
2014, cc. 789, 795; 2020, cc. 542, 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation
cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact
of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 542, in subdivision A 1, inserted “requests a service pursuant to a membership or a service agreement”; and in subsection B, substituted “A 1, 3, 4, 5, or 6” for “A 3, 4, 5, or 6” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the introductory language of subsection A, which formerly read: “No merchant may scan the machine-readable zone of a Department of Motor Vehicles-issued identification
card or driver’s license, except for the following purposes”; substituted “driver’s license or other document” for “identification card or driver’s license” or similar language throughout the section; substituted “the laws of the Commonwealth”
for “state” in subdivision A 4; and inserted the first occurrence of “federal” in subdivision A 6.

§ 59.1-444.
Damages.

A person aggrieved by a violation of any provision of this chapter, except § 59.1-443.2, shall be entitled to institute an action to recover damages in the amount of $100 per violation. In addition, if the aggrieved party prevails, he may be awarded reasonable
attorney’s fees and court costs. Actions under this section shall be brought in the general district court for the city or county in which the transaction or other violation that gave rise to the action occurred. A violation of the
provisions of § 59.1-443.2 is a prohibited practice under the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.
1992, c. 807; 1993, c. 453; 2004, c. 241; 2005, c. 640.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 241 rewrote the first and next-to-last sentences and substituted “or other violation that” for “which” in the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 640 inserted “any provision of” preceding “this chapter,” “except § 59.1-443.2” preceding “shall be entitled,” and added the last sentence.